Utah statutes.
13-11-9.   Rule-making requirements.

(1) In addition to complying with other rule-making requirements imposed by this act, the enforcing authority shall:

(a)  adopt as a rule a description of the organization of his office, stating the general course and method of operation of his office and method whereby the public may obtain information or make submissions or requests;

(b)  adopt rules of practice setting forth the nature and requirements of all formal and informal procedures available, including a description of the forms and instructions used by the enforcing authority of his office; and

(c)  make available for public inspection all rules, written statements of policy, and interpretations formulated, adopted, or used by the enforcing authority in discharging his functions.

(2)  A rule of the enforcing authority is invalid, and may not be invoked by the enforcing authority for any purpose, until it has been made available for public inspection under Subsection (1). This provision does not apply to a person who has knowledge of a rule before engaging in an act or practice that violates this act.

